Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1814
Inquest; return to district court; contents; duty.

The coroner shall return to the district court the inquisition, the papers connected with the same, and a list of the names of witnesses who testified in the matter.

Laws 1879, § 109, p. 383;

R.S.1913, § 5676;

C.S.1922, § 5006;

C.S.1929, § 26-1515;

R.S.1943, § 23-1814.